Wisconsin, session 2025, SB778.
do enact as follows:SB778,11Section 1. 20.370 (6) (pr) of the statutes is created to read:SB778,2,4220.370 (6) (pr) Producer responsibility program. From the environmental 3fund, all moneys received under s. 287.30 (4) (b) 4. and (9) (b) to provide the grant 4under s. 287.30 (9) (a) and the reimbursements under s. 287.30 (9) (c).SB778,25Section 2. 25.46 (1) (pr) of the statutes is created to read:SB778,3,1125.46 (1) (pr) The moneys received under s. 287.30 (4) (b) 4. and (9) (b).SB778,32Section 3. 287.30 of the statutes is created to read:SB778,3,43287.30 Packaging reduction and recycling. (1) Definitions. In this 4section:SB778,3,65(a) “Beverage container” means a container used to contain drinks in liquid 6form and intended for human consumption.SB778,3,97(b) “Bio-plastic” means plastic produced from biological sources, such as 8vegetable fats and oils, polysaccharides, sugar, and proteins, or other materials that 9are designed to be biodegradable.SB778,3,1210(c) “Brand” means any mark, word, name, symbol, design, device, or graphical 11element or a combination thereof, including a registered or unregistered 12trademark, that identifies and distinguishes a product from other products.SB778,3,1313(d) “Covered entity” means any of the following:SB778,3,14141. A single-family residence.SB778,3,15152. A multifamily residence.SB778,3,18163. A public school, as defined in s. 115.01 (1), a private school, as defined in s. 17115.001 (3r), a charter school, as defined in s. 115.001 (1), or a tribal school, as 18defined in s. 115.001 (15m).SB778,3,20194. A nonprofit corporation or institution such as a university, hospital, or 20other nonprofit or institutional facility.SB778,3,22215. A for-profit business such as a retail store, restaurant, or other commercial 22property.SB778,3,24236. A state agency, political subdivision, public entity, or other governmental 24unit.SB778,4,31(e) “Discarded” means packaging material that has been used for its intended 2purpose and is no longer needed by consumers, businesses, institutions, and other 3users and may be managed through reuse, recycling, or disposal.SB778,4,44(f) “Disposal” means all of the following:SB778,4,551. The landfilling or incineration of packaging material. SB778,4,862. Energy recovery or energy generation by any means, including combustion, 7pyrolysis, gasification, solvolysis, thermal desorption, waste-to-fuel, or any other 8chemical conversion process or molecular conversion process.SB778,4,993. The use of materials as landfill cover.SB778,4,1410(g) “Environmental justice community” means any neighborhood or 11community that is composed predominantly of persons of color or persons whose 12income is below the poverty line and that is subject to a disproportionate burden of 13environmental hazards, including landfills, incinerators, transfer stations, or 14waste-to-energy facilities.SB778,4,1815(h) “Local unit of government” means the governing body of any county, city, 16village, or town and any sanitary district or other political subdivision of the state 17authorized to plan or provide for waste management services for a specific 18geographical area.SB778,4,2319(i) “Packaging” means a discrete material or category of material, regardless 20of recyclability, including paper, plastic, glass, metal, or multi-material that is used 21for the containment, protection, handling, delivery, transport, distribution, or 22presentation of another product that is sold, offered for sale, imported, or 23distributed into this state. “Packaging” does not include any of the following:SB778,5,2241. Medical devices and packaging that are included with products regulated 1as a drug, medical device, or dietary supplement by the federal food and drug 2administration under 21 USC 321 et seq. or 21 CFR Part 111.SB778,5,532. Animal biologics, including vaccines, bacterins, antisera, diagnostic kits, 4and other products of biological origin, and other covered materials regulated by the 5federal department of agriculture under 21 USC 151 to 159.SB778,5,663. Packaging regulated under 7 USC 136 et seq.SB778,5,774. Beverage containers subject to a returnable container deposit.SB778,5,118(j) “Packaging reduction organization” means a nonprofit entity contracted by 9the department to collect producer payment of fees, assist producers with 10compliance with the requirements of this section, provide technical assistance to 11producers, and implement the producer responsibility program.SB778,5,1612(k) “Plastic” means a synthetic or semi-synthetic material made from linking 13monomers derived from fossil fuel or biological sources through a chemical reaction 14to create a polymer chain that can be molded, extruded, or otherwise shaped into 15pellets, objects, films, or filaments, whether alone or in combination with chemical 16additives, including plasticizers, stabilizers, colorants, or flame retardants.SB778,5,2417(L) “Post-consumer recycled material” means new material produced using 18material resulting from the recovery, separation, collection, and reprocessing of 19material that would otherwise be disposed of or processed as waste and that was 20originally sold for consumption. “Post-consumer recycled material” does not include 21post-industrial material or pre-consumer material, or material created by means of 22advanced recycling, chemical recycling, combustion, gasification, incineration, 23pyrolysis, solvolysis, thermal desorption, waste-to-energy, waste-to-fuel, or any 24other chemical or molecular conversion process.SB778,6,11(m) “Producer” means all of the following:SB778,6,421. A person that manufactures or uses in commercial enterprise a product 3sold, offered for sale, contained, protected, delivered, presented, or distributed in or 4using packaging into this state under the brand of the manufacturer.SB778,6,852. A person that is not the manufacturer of a product but that is the owner or 6licensee of a trademark, regardless of whether the trademark is registered, under 7which a product is sold, offered for sale, contained, protected, delivered, presented, 8or distributed in or using packaging.SB778,6,1193. A person that imports a product that is contained, protected, delivered, or 10presented in packaging into the United States or this state for use in commercial 11enterprise in this state.SB778,6,13124. A franchisor of a franchise located in this state, except that “producer” does 13not include the franchisee operating that franchise.SB778,6,1714(n) “Producer responsibility program” means the program implemented by 15the packaging reduction organization, and overseen by the department, to reduce 16packaging and to assess and collect information and payments from producers to 17pay for the development of packaging reduction programs.SB778,6,2018(o) “Product Line” means a group of related products all marketed under a 19single brand name that is sold by the same producer to distinguish products from 20each other for better usability for customers.SB778,7,221(p) “Recyclable” means a product or packaging material that can be sorted by 22entities that process post-consumer materials created in the state, that has a 23consistent regional market for purchase by end users in the production of new 1products, and that can be recycled with minimal losses of material during 2processing and manufacturing. “Recyclable” does not include any of the following:SB778,7,631. Material processed through advanced recycling, chemical recycling, 4combustion, gasification, incineration, pyrolysis, solvolysis, thermal desorption, 5waste-to-energy, waste-to-fuel, or any other chemical or molecular conversion 6process. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb778 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb778 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB778 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB778 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB778: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting